Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1 Uniform Unclaimed Property Act
66-29-123. Report required by holder.

A holder of property presumed abandoned and subject to the custody of the treasurer shall report in a record to the treasurer concerning the property. The report must be filed through an electronic medium in a manner prescribed by the treasurer. The treasurer may waive the requirement to file the report through an electronic medium if the holder demonstrates in writing that strict compliance would be too costly or oppressive to the holder. In such event, the holder shall file the report in such alternate medium as the treasurer deems acceptable.

A holder may contract with a third party to create the report required under subsection (a).

Regardless of whether a holder contracts with a third party under subsection (b), the holder is responsible:

To the treasurer for the complete, accurate, and timely reporting of property presumed abandoned; and

For paying or delivering to the treasurer property described in the report filed under this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-124. Content of report.

The report required under § 66-29-123 must:

Be signed by or on behalf of the holder and verified as to its completeness and accuracy;

If filed electronically, be in a secure format approved by the treasurer;

Describe the property;

Except for the report of a traveler's check, money order, or similar instrument, contain, if known or readily ascertainable, the name, last known address, date of birth, and social security number or taxpayer identification number of the apparent owner of property with a value of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more;

In the case of an amount held or owing under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract, contain the full name and last known address of the insured, annuitant, or other apparent owner of the policy or contract and of the beneficiary;

In the case of property held in or removed from a safe-deposit box, indicate the contents of the property and the name and last known address of the apparent owner;

Contain the commencement date for determining abandonment under this part;

State that the holder has complied with the notice requirements of § 66-29-128;

Identify property that is a non-freely transferable security, and explain why it is a non-freely transferable security; and

Contain any other information the treasurer may require by rule.

A report under § 66-29-123 may include, in the aggregate, items valued at less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per item. If the report includes items, in the aggregate, valued at less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per item, the treasurer shall not require the holder to provide the name and address of an apparent owner of an item unless the information is necessary to verify or process a claim in progress by the apparent owner.

A report under § 66-29-123 may include confidential information as described in § 66-29-178 about the apparent owner or the apparent owner's property to the extent not otherwise prohibited by federal law.

If a holder has changed its name while holding property presumed abandoned or is a successor to another person who previously held the property for the apparent owner, the holder shall include in the report under § 66-29-123 its former name or the name of the previous holder, if any, and the last known name and address of each previous holder of the property.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-125. Filing of report.

For the property held for the period of January 1, 2017, through December 31, 2017, the report under § 66-29-123 must be filed before May 1, 2018. For property held for the period of January 1, 2018, through June 30, 2019, the report under § 66-29-123 must be filed before November 1, 2019. Thereafter, the report must be filed before November 1 of each year and must cover the twelve (12) months preceding July 1 of that year.

Before the date for filing the report under § 66-29-123, the holder of property presumed abandoned may request the treasurer to extend the time for filing. The treasurer may grant an extension for good cause. If the extension is granted, the holder may pay or make a partial payment of the amount the holder estimates ultimately will be due. The payment or partial payment terminates accrual of interest on the amount paid.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1; 2018, ch. 822, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “The report under §66-29-123 must be filed before May 1 of each year and report property held as of December 31 of the preceding year.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 822, § 2. April 24, 2018.

66-29-126. Retention of records by holder.

A holder required to file a report under §66-29-123 shall retain records for ten (10) years after the later of the date the report was filed or the last date a timely report was due to be filed, unless a shorter period is prescribed by rule of the treasurer. A holder may satisfy the requirement to retain records under this section through an agent. The records must contain:

The information required to be included in the report;

The date, place, and nature of the circumstances that gave rise to the property right;

The amount or value of the property;

The last address of the apparent owner, if known to the holder; and

If the holder sells, issues, or provides to others for sale or issue in this state traveler's checks, money orders, or similar instruments, other than third-party bank checks, and on which the holder is directly liable a record of the instruments while they remain outstanding indicating the state and date of issuance.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-126 (originally §66-29-125) (Acts 1978, ch. 561, § 25; T.C.A., §§ 64-2925,66-29-125), concerning the examination of private records by the state treasurer, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 195, § 19, effective July 1, 1993.

Original §66-29-126 was transferred to §66-29-127.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-127. Property reportable and payable or deliverable absent owner demand.

Property is reportable and payable or deliverable under this part even if the owner fails to make demand or present an instrument or document otherwise required to obtain payment.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-127 was transferred to §66-29-128.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-128. Agreements to ascertain whereabouts of apparent owner — Notice to apparent owner by holder.

Any holder of property not yet presumed abandoned under this part may enter into agreements as may be necessary to ascertain the whereabouts of the apparent owner; provided, that costs associated with such agreements must not be deducted from the property or charged to the owner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), the holder of property presumed abandoned shall send notice that complies with § 66-29-129 to the apparent owner in a form approved by the treasurer, by first-class United States mail, not more than one hundred eighty (180) days, nor less than sixty (60) days, before filing the report under § 66-29-123 if:

The holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent owner, which the holder's records do not disclose to be invalid; and

The value of the property is fifty dollars ($50.00) or more.

If an apparent owner has consented to receive electronic mail communications from the holder, the holder shall send the notice described in subsection (a) both by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner's last known mailing address and by electronic mail, unless the holder has reason to believe that the apparent owner's electronic mail address is not valid.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-128 was transferred to §66-29-129.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-129. Contents of notice by holder.

The notice under § 66-29-128 must contain a heading that reads substantially as follows: “Notice: The State of Tennessee requires us to notify you that your property may be transferred to the custody of the treasurer if you do not contact us within thirty (30) days after the date of this notice.”

The notice under § 66-29-128 must:

State that the property will be turned over to the treasurer;

State that, after the property is turned over to the treasurer, an apparent owner that seeks return of the property must file a claim with the treasurer;

Identify any owners of the property;

Identify the nature and, except for property that does not have a fixed value, the value of the property that is the subject of the notice;

State that property which is not legal tender of the United States may be sold by the treasurer; and

Provide instructions that the apparent owner must follow to prevent the holder from reporting and paying or delivering the property to the treasurer.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-129 was transferred to §66-29-130.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-130. Notice by treasurer.

The treasurer shall give notice to an apparent owner that property presumed abandoned and that appears to be owned by the apparent owner is held by the treasurer under this part. The treasurer may prescribe by rule a minimum dollar value for items for which notice is sent.

In providing notice under subsection (a), the treasurer shall:

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(2), send written notice by first-class United States mail to each apparent owner of property held by the treasurer, unless the treasurer determines that a mailing by first-class United States mail would not be received by the apparent owner, and, in the case of a security held in an account for which the apparent owner consented to receiving electronic mail from the holder, send notice by electronic mail rather than first-class United States mail if the electronic mail address of the apparent owner is known to the treasurer;

Send the notice to the apparent owner's electronic mail address if the treasurer does not have a valid United States mail address for an apparent owner, but has an electronic mail address that the treasurer does not know to be invalid;

Publish every six (6) months in at least one newspaper of general circulation in this state notice of property held by the treasurer that must include:

The total value of property received by the treasurer during the immediately preceding six (6) months, as indicated from the reports filed under § 66-29-123;

The total value of claims paid by the treasurer during the immediately preceding six (6) months;

The address of the unclaimed property website maintained by the treasurer;

A telephone number and electronic mail address to contact the treasurer to inquire about or claim property; and

A statement that a person may access the unclaimed property website of the treasurer through a computer to search for unclaimed property and that a computer may be available as a service to the public at a local public library; and

Maintain a website or database, accessible by the public, that is electronically searchable and that contains the names reported to the treasurer of all apparent owners for whom property is being held by the treasurer; provided, that the treasurer may prescribe by rule a minimum dollar value for property listed on the website.

The website or database maintained under subdivision (b)(4) must include instructions for filing with the treasurer a claim to property.

In addition to giving notice under subsection (b), the treasurer may use printed publication, telecommunication, the internet, or other media to inform the public of the existence of unclaimed property held by the treasurer.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-130 was transferred to §66-29-131.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-131. Cooperation among state officers and agencies to locate apparent owner.

Unless otherwise prohibited by any law of this state, on request of the treasurer, each officer, agency, board, commission, division, and department of this state, any body, politic and corporate, created by this state for a public purpose, and each political subdivision of this state shall make its books and records available to the treasurer and cooperate with the treasurer to determine the current address of an apparent owner of property held by the treasurer under this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-131 was transferred to §66-29-132.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-132. Good faith payment or delivery of property by holder.

Under this part, payment or delivery of property is made in good faith if a holder:

Had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known, that the property was required or permitted to be paid or delivered to the treasurer under this part; or

Made payment or delivery:

In response to a demand by the treasurer or treasurer's agent; or

Pursuant to guidance or a ruling issued by the treasurer that the holder reasonably believed required or permitted the property to be paid or delivered.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-132 was transferred to §66-29-133.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-133. Dormancy charge.

A holder may deduct a dormancy charge from property required to be paid or delivered to the treasurer if:

A valid and enforceable contract between a holder and an apparent owner authorizes imposition of the charge for the apparent owner's failure to claim the property within a specified time; and

The holder regularly imposes the charge and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel the charge.

The amount of the deduction under subsection (a) is limited to an amount that is not unconscionable considering all relevant factors, including the marginal transactional costs incurred by the holder in maintaining the apparent owner's property and any services received by the apparent owner.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section was formerly compiled as §66-29-132.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-134. Payment or delivery of property to treasurer.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, upon filing a report under § 66-29-123, the holder shall pay or deliver to the treasurer the property described in the report. Property paid to the treasurer must be remitted through an electronic funds transfer as prescribed by the treasurer. The treasurer may waive the requirement to submit payment by electronic means for holders who demonstrate in writing that compliance would be too costly or oppressive to the holder.

Any unclaimed checks held by the state that were derived from one hundred percent (100%) federal funding must not be delivered to the treasurer under this part if such delivery would render the state ineligible for future federal funding. Upon written request and for good cause shown, the treasurer may postpone the payment or delivery upon such terms and conditions as the treasurer deems necessary and appropriate.

If property in a report under § 66-29-123 is an automatically renewable deposit and a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result from paying the deposit to the treasurer at the time of the report, the date for payment of the property to the treasurer is extended until the date when payment would no longer result in a penalty or forfeiture if the holder informs the treasurer of such date.

Except for military medals, tangible property must not be delivered to the treasurer at the time of filing the report. The treasurer shall review the report of such property and be given the opportunity to decline to receive any such property reported if the treasurer determines that the value of the property is less than the cost of giving notice and holding sale, or the treasurer may, because of the small sum involved, postpone taking possession until property of a sufficient value accumulates. Unless the holder of such property is notified to the contrary within one hundred twenty (120) days after filing the report required under § 66-29-123, the treasurer is deemed to have elected to receive custody of the property and the holder thereof shall, at the end of such one hundred twenty (120) days, pay or deliver such property to the treasurer.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, contents removed from any safe deposit box, safekeeping repository or agency, or collateral deposit box described in § 66-29-109, except for military medals, must be sold or disposed of by the holder in accordance with § 45-2-907, or pursuant to instructions received from the treasurer, and the proceeds, less reasonable costs of sale and storage, must be remitted to the treasurer within sixty (60) days of sale. Military medals must be retained, and reported and delivered to the treasurer, in accordance with § 66-29-109(b).

If property reported to the treasurer under § 66-29-123 is a security, the treasurer may:

Make an endorsement, instruction, or entitlement order on behalf of the apparent owner to invoke the duty of the issuer, its transfer agent, or the securities intermediary to transfer the security; or

Dispose of the security under § 66-29-142.

If the holder of property reported to the treasurer under § 66-29-123 is the issuer of a certificated security, the treasurer may obtain a replacement certificate in physical or book-entry form in the manner in which an owner may obtain a replacement certificate under § 47-8-405. An indemnity bond is not required.

The treasurer shall establish procedures for the registration, issuance, method of delivery, transfer, and maintenance of securities delivered to the treasurer by a holder.

An issuer, holder, or transfer agent, or other person acting under the instructions of, and on behalf of, the issuer or holder under this section, who delivers abandoned property to the treasurer under this part is relieved of all liability to the extent of the value of the property delivered for any claim which then exists or which thereafter may arise or be made in respect to the property.

A holder is not required to deliver to the treasurer a security identified by the holder as a non-freely transferable security. Upon determination by the treasurer or the holder that a security is no longer a non-freely transferable security, the security must be subsequently remitted on the next regular date prescribed for delivery of securities under this part. The holder shall make a determination annually whether a security identified in a report filed under § 66-29-123 as a non-freely transferable security is no longer a non-freely transferable security.

Notwithstanding this part, United States savings bonds that are unclaimed and presumptively abandoned under this part shall escheat to the state at the time of the presumed abandonment, and all property rights to such United States savings bonds or proceeds from such bonds shall thereupon vest solely in the state.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days after the bonds and obligations thereunder have been reported by a holder pursuant to § 66-29-123, if no claim has been filed in accordance with this part for such United States bonds and obligations, the treasurer shall commence a civil action in the chancery court of Davidson County to determine whether such United States savings bonds shall escheat to the state. The treasurer may postpone the bringing of such action until sufficient United States savings bonds have accumulated in the treasurer's custody to justify the expense of such proceedings.

The summons and complaint must name the last known owner as the defendant, and must be served and filed as provided by law. At the time of the filing of the summons and complaint, the treasurer shall mail to the last known address of the owner a notice entitled “Notice of Proceedings to Confirm Certain United States Savings Bonds as Escheated to the State of Tennessee,” which must include the following information:

The name and last known address of the owner, if previously reported;

A statement identifying the action and stating that its purpose is to confirm escheat of the property to the state;

The place, time, and date of the hearing; and

A direction that any person claiming to be entitled to such United States savings bonds may claim the property before or at the hearing.

At the time the action is commenced, the treasurer, as to all items having a value in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00), shall also cause the notice provided in subdivision (k)(3) to be published once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the county in which the last known address of the owner is located, according to the records on file with the treasurer. If no address is available, the notice must be published in such time, place, and manner as, in the treasurer's judgment, is most likely to notify the owner of the proceedings.

If no person files a claim or appears at the hearing to substantiate a claim, or if the court determines that a claimant is not entitled to the property claimed by such claimant, then the court, if satisfied by evidence that the treasurer has substantially complied with this section, shall enter a judgment confirming that the subject United States savings bonds have escheated to the state.

The treasurer shall redeem such United States savings bonds escheated to the state and the proceeds from such redemption must be deposited in accordance with § 66-29-146.

Any person making a claim for United States savings bonds escheated to the state under this subsection (k), or for the proceeds from such bonds, may file a claim in accordance with § 66-29-152. Upon receiving sufficient proof of the validity of such person's claim, the treasurer may pay such claim in accordance with § 66-29-153.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 285, § 6 provided that §§ 3-5 of the act, which amended former §§66-29-104 and former66-29-115, shall apply to all military medals that are removed from a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository or agency or collateral deposit box after July 1, 2011.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.